Maine, session 132, LD1179.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §2452, first ¶, as repealed and replaced by PL 2011, c. 691, Pt.
A, §25, is amended to read:
The Commissioner of Public Safety shall adopt and may amend rules governing the
safety to life from fire in or around all buildings or other structures, recreational vehicles
as defined in National Fire Protection Association standard 1192 and mass outdoor
gatherings, as defined in Title 22, section 1601, subsection 2, within the commissioner's
jurisdiction. Automatic sprinkler systems may not be required in existing noncommercial
places of assembly. Noncommercial places of assembly include those facilities used for
such purposes as deliberation, worship, entertainment, amusement or awaiting
transportation that have a capacity of 100 to 300 persons. Automatic sprinkler systems
may not be required in existing commercial places of assembly that are open for no more
than 50 days per calendar year. "Commercial places of assembly" includes bars with live
entertainment, dance halls, nightclubs, assembly halls with large open areas in which
patrons stand or sit, commonly referred to as "festival seating," and restaurants. Rules
adopted pursuant to this section are routine technical rules, except that rules pertaining to
fire sprinklers are major substantive rules, both of which are defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 2. 25 MRSA §2452, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2003, c. 535, §3, is further
amended to read:
3. Violation. A person who violates a rule issued by the commissioner under this
section commits a Class E crime. Violation of this section is a strict liability crime as
defined in Title 17-A, section 34, subsection 4-A.
Sec. 3. Report. The Department of Public Safety, Office of the State Fire Marshal,
shall notify the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over housing
matters if the department proposes to adopt through rulemaking the National Fire
Protection Association standard 1192 on recreational vehicles.
Page 1 - 132LR1821(03)